Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.260

Certificate of membership in nonstock associations.

When a member of an association established without shares of stock has paid his or her membership fee in full, he or she shall receive a certificate of membership.

[ 2011 c 336 s 678; 1959 c 312 s 26.]